incubator/apertium-lv-lg/apertium-lv-lg.lv.twol
Alphabet

 a ā b c č d e ē f g ģ h i ī j k ķ l ļ m n ņ o ō p r ŗ s š t u ū v z ž
 A Ā B C Č D E Ē F G Ģ H I Ī J K Ķ L Ļ M N Ņ O Ō P R Ŗ S Š T U Ū V Z Ž
 DZ dz 
 %^DS:0
 %':0 %>:0 ;


Sets

bezDiakr = A C E G I K L N O R S U Z
	   a c e g i k l n o r s u z;
arDiakr	 = Ā Č Ē Ģ Ī Ķ Ļ Ņ Ō Ŗ Š Ū Ž
	   ā č ē ģ ī ķ ļ ņ ō ŗ š ū ž;


Rules

"Līdzskaņu mija lietvārdos: apostrofa aizvietošana"
Cx:Cy <=> _ %': ;
	where Cx in ( c l n s z d t k g  )
	      Cy in ( č ļ ņ š ž ž š c dz )
	matched;

"Palatalisation"
%':j <=>  Cx _ ;
    where Cx in ( b p v f ) ;




!"d to s in 1rd Conjugation, 1rd Group, 3d Type"
!d:s <=> _ %^DS: t ; 

! "k to c in 1rd Conjugation, 1rd Group, 2d Type"
! k:c <=> _ %^KC: t ; 
